Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 456.250 is amended to read:
456.250. As used in this section and ORS 456.255 to 456.265:
(1) “Affordability restriction”  means a limit on rents that a property owner may charge at a
participating property or a limitation on the use of a  participating property as set forth in a con-
tract.
(2) “Contract” means a written agreement entered into by a  property owner under which a
participating property becomes publicly supported housing that is subject  to an affordability re-
striction. “Contract” includes, but is not  limited to, a deed restriction, loan agreement, operating
agreement or any other written agreement that results  in an affordability restriction being placed
on the property.
(3) “Local government” means a city, county, public corporation[ ,] or metropolitan service dis-
trict [ or other district, political subdivision or any board, commission or agency thereof ].
(4) “Participating property” means property that is the  subject of a contract by which the
property becomes publicly supported housing that is subject to an affordability restriction.
(5) “Property owner” or “owner” means the owner or long-term lessee of  a participating
property.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a)  “Publicly supported  housing” means a multifamily rental housing development of
five or more units that receives or benefits from government assistance under:
(A) A contract for rent assistance from the United States Department of  Housing and Urban
Development, the United States Department of Agriculture  or the Housing and Community Services
Department that contains an affordability restriction; or
(B) A contract that is  for any other type of government assistance or subsidy that includes an
affordability restriction and that is identified in rules adopted by the Housing  and Community Ser-
vices Department.
(b) “Publicly supported housing” does not include a multifamily rental housing development:
(A) For which the development or developer receives only  a construction excise tax waiver, a
system development charge waiver, a fee waiver or a property tax abatement;
(B) That is part of an inclusionary housing  program as defined by local government and au-
thorized under [ chapter 59, Oregon Laws 2016 ] ORS 197.309;
(C) That receives tenant-based  federal rent subsidy payments under the Housing Choice Voucher
Program authorized by 42 U.S.C. 1437f;
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 1
(D) That receives project-based rental  assistance vouchers administered by a housing authority
under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437f (o)(13)); or
(E) That receives  tenant vouchers from the United States Department of Agriculture under
section 542 of the Housing Act of 1949 (42 U.S.C. 1471).
[(6)] (7)  “Qualified purchaser” means a local government  entitled to notice under ORS 456.260
(2), the Housing and Community Services Department  or a designee appointed by the department
under ORS 456.262.
(8) “Third party offeror” or “third party” means a party that is not a qualified purchaser
and that has made an offer to purchase, or  has purchased, a participating property from a
property owner.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of  this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 456.255 to
456.265.
SECTION 3. (1) ORS 456.255 to  456.265 do not apply to or restrict the acquisition of
property by:
(a) A government that acquires the  participating property by eminent domain or a ne-
gotiated purchase in lieu of eminent domain.
(b) A purchaser of the participating property  in a foreclosure sale that terminates the
affordability restrictions.
(c) A purchaser of  the participating property by a deed in lieu of foreclosure provided
that the contract restrictions are subordinate to  the purchaser’s interest eligible for fore-
closure and a notice of the deed in lieu is provided to  the Housing and Community Services
Department by the purchaser or property owner at least 30 days prior  to the execution of
the deed in lieu.
(2) ORS 456.255 to 456.265 may not  be interpreted to allow a property owner to terminate
or breach  a contract or to limit the rights of any tenant of a participating property or any
other person who may enforce an affordability restriction against the property owner.
(3) ORS 456.255 to 456.265  do not require any local government or the department to
purchase or condemn  any property or to maintain the affordability restrictions of any prop-
erty.
(4) Except as required by contract and ORS 456.255 to  456.265, a property owner may not
take any action during the contract  term that would materially interfere with a qualified
purchaser’s ability to continue maintaining  the participating property as publicly supported
housing.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement ORS 456.255 to 456.265.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 456.260 is amended to read:
456.260. [(1) For the purpose of dealing with expiring and terminating contracts  for participating
properties, the owner of a participating property shall: ]
[(a) Provide notice by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to each local government
entitled to notice and the Housing and Community Services Department two years prior to  the date
when:]
(1) The owner of a participating property shall provide notice in a  format prescribed the
Housing and  Community Services Department, including by electronic delivery or by regis-
tered or certified mail, to  each local government entitled to notice and to the department
no sooner than 36 months prior and at least 30 months prior to the date when:
[(A)] (a) [ The contract for the  property to participate in publicly supported housing will expire or
terminate] A contract term will expire, permitting the owner  to withdraw the participating
property from publicly supported housing or limit affordability restrictions on the property ;
or
[(B)] (b)  The owner intends to withdraw the participating property [ will be withdrawn ] from
publicly supported housing[ , whether  by sale, transfer, nonrenewal of the contract or otherwise, such
that the property will no longer be a participating property ].
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 2
[(b) Consent to reasonable inspection of the property and inspection  of the owner reports on file
with the Housing and Community Services Department or the United  States Department of Housing
and Urban Development, if applicable. ]
[(c) Maintain the contract  for property participation in publicly supported housing in good standing
during the notice period referred to under this section. ]
[(d) Refrain from taking any action, other than notifying  the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development  or other party to the contract of the owner’s intention to not renew the contract
or to withdraw  the participating property from publicly supported housing, that would preclude a
qualified purchaser from succeeding  to the contract or negotiating with the owner for the purchase of
the property. ]
(2) [ A] The property owner shall send a copy of the notice in  subsection (1) of this section
to each  local government [ is entitled to notice under this section  if ] within which the participating
property is located [ within the boundaries of the local government ].
(3) [If the property owner does not comply with the notice requirements under subsection (1)  of this
section,] If the notice is not delivered timely,  the  property owner shall extend the affordability
restriction on the participating property [ by the number of  months that the property owner is in
noncompliance with the notice requirements under ] for no less than 24 months  after delivering the
untimely notice under subsection (1) of this section and [ immediately] provide notice of the ex-
tension to the Housing and Community Services Department and each local government that  is
entitled to notice [ of the extension of the affordability restriction pursuant to this section together  with
the notice required ] under subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section.
[(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply when: ]
[(a) A local government or the  state takes the participating property by eminent domain or a ne-
gotiated purchase in lieu of eminent domain; ]
[(b) There is a forced sale of the participating property under a foreclosure; or ]
[(c) The participating property is subject to a deed in lieu of foreclosure. ]
[(5)] (4) A local government may:
(a) Establish and impose  any fine, penalty, tax, fee, charge or assessment upon the owner of
participating property for failure to comply with local regulations adopted to  implement the pro-
visions of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Require an owner to refrain from disturbing tenancies, other than  for cause as defined in the
contract, for a period of not  more than 180 days after expiration of the contract or withdrawal of
the participating property from publicly supported housing if  the local government pays, or arranges
for payment, to the owner on the first day of each month,  the monthly subsidy that the owner was
receiving under the contract.
(c) Make application to the Housing and Community  Services Department requesting that a lo-
cal subsidy program be included in the definition of publicly supported housing, as long  as the pro-
gram otherwise complies with and  is not excluded from the definition of publicly supported housing.
[(6)] (5)  Any notices provided under subsection (1)[ (a)] of this  section shall specify whether the
owner:
(a) Intends to withdraw the participating property from publicly supported housing.
(b) Intends to convert the participating property to a nonparticipating use.
(c) Is involved in negotiations with the United States Department of Housing and Urban De-
velopment, the Housing and Community Services Department or any other individual  or entity re-
garding an extension of an expiring contract.
[(7) ORS  456.255 to 456.265 do not require the Housing and Community Services Department or
a local government to purchase, condemn or otherwise acquire participating property. ]
[(8) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall adopt rules to implement the pro-
visions of this section with respect to the duties, powers and functions of the department. ]
SECTION 5.
 ORS 456.262 is amended to read:
456.262. (1) A property owner shall provide notice in a format prescribed by the  Housing
and Community Services Department, including by electronic delivery or registered  or cer-
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 3
tified mail, to each local government entitled to notice under ORS 456.260 and to the de-
partment, no  sooner than 30 months prior and at least 24 months prior to any withdrawal
of the participating property from publicly supported housing, including  by an expiration of
a contract.  [Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a property owner shall provide  notice
by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the Housing and Community Services  De-
partment and each local government entitled to notice under ORS 456.260,  of the opportunity to offer
to purchase a participating property at least 13 months prior to the occurrence of any of the following
actions if the action  will result in withdrawal of the participating property from publicly supported
housing:]
[(a) Refinancing of the primary mortgage; ]
[(b) Recapitalizing for purposes of rehabilitation or repair; ]
[(c) Entering into an agreement to sell the property to a new property owner; or ]
[(d) Withdrawing the participating property from publicly supported housing. ]
[(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply when: ]
[(a) A local government or the  state takes the participating property by eminent domain or a ne-
gotiated purchase in lieu of eminent domain; ]
[(b) There is a forced sale of the participating property under a foreclosure; or ]
[(c) The participating property is subject to a deed in lieu of foreclosure. ]
[(3)(a) The property owner shall provide the notice required in  subsection (1) of this section to af-
ford the qualified purchasers the opportunity to purchase required by this section within  the time
frames indicated in subsection (5) of this section. ]
[(b) A property  owner is under no obligation to accept a qualified purchaser’s offer made pursuant
to subsection (5) of this section. ]
[(4)] (2)  The department may  appoint a designee to act as purchaser of the participating prop-
erty. The appointment becomes effective  upon the department delivering to [and shall give ] the
property owner notice of the appointment of a designee. The department must consult with  each
local government where  the property is located before appointing a designee under this subsection.
The department [ must] shall  enter into a written  agreement with the appointed designee
[providing] requiring that the designee and any of the designee’s successors or assigns:
(a) Agree to preserve the affordability of the participating property; and
(b) Assume  all rights and responsibilities attributable to the department as a prospective pur-
chaser of the participating property.
[(5) A qualified purchaser may, within 90 days from the  date of a property owner’s notice under
subsection (1) of this section, submit an  offer to the property owner to purchase the participating
property. Failure by all qualified purchasers to submit a timely offer constitutes an  irrevocable waiver
of the each qualified purchaser’s rights under this section, and,  subject to ORS 456.263, the property
owner may sell the participating property to a third  party or withdraw the participating property from
publicly supported housing. ]
(3) After the property owner has delivered the notice  under subsection (1) of this section,
a qualified purchaser may deliver by certified mail, with return receipt requested, an offer
to the  property owner to purchase the participating property, which includes a notice that
the qualified purchaser may, after 30 days, record a notice of  right of first refusal under
subsection (4) of this section. A  property owner is under no obligation to accept an offer
made under this subsection.
(4) At any time after a qualified purchaser  has made an offer to purchase the partic-
ipating property under subsection (3) of this section  and no later than two months before the
owner may withdraw the property under subsection (5) of this section, a  qualified purchaser
may record in the real property records of the county, a notice  of right of first refusal in a
form prepared by the department that:
(a) Includes a legal description of the participating property;
(b) Attaches a copy of the notice delivered with the offer and proof of  mailing of the
notice as required by subsection (3) of this section;
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 4
(c) Declares that the department or local government party acknowledging the instru-
ment holds the right of first refusal to  purchase the property under ORS 456.263 and that
the acknowledging party may assign the right  of first refusal to a qualified purchaser and
that right may be, from time to time, reassigned;
(d) Declares that the  right of first refusal shall expire 24 months after the date the
property may be withdrawn from publicly supported housing under subsection (5) of this
section;
(e) Declares that a copy of the recorded notice of  right of first refusal must be promptly
delivered to the property owner by the qualified purchaser offering  the instrument for re-
cording; and
(f) Is executed and acknowledged by  the local government or department in the manner
provided for the acknowledgment of deeds.
[(6)] (5) [ If, within  210 days from the date of a property owner’s notice under subsection (1) of this
section or within such other period of time to which the qualified purchasers and the property owner
may agree, the property owner has not accepted any qualified purchaser’s offer to  purchase the par-
ticipating property, each qualified purchaser’s offer shall  expire, each qualified purchaser’s right to
purchase the  participating property under this section shall terminate and, subject to ORS 456.263, ]
The property owner may [ sell the participating property to a third  party or ] withdraw the partic-
ipating property from publicly supported housing  and terminate the affordability restrictions
upon the latest of:
(a) 24 months following the owner’s delivery of all notices required under  subsection (1)
of this section;
(b) 30 months following the owner’s delivery of  all notices required under ORS 456.260 (1);
or
(c) Expiration of all affordability restrictions period set forth in any contract .
[(7)] (6)  At any time after the notice described in subsection (1) of this  section has been pro-
vided, [ a qualified purchaser  may request, in writing, that the property owner make available, ] within
30 days of the request  from a qualified  purchaser , the property owner shall make available
documents that are relevant to  the participating property at the property owner’s principal place
of business or at a commercial photocopying facility.
[(8)(a)] (7)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 192.311 to 192.478  relating to public re-
cords, the documents provided by the property  owner to a qualified purchaser under  subsection
[(7)] (6)  of this section are confidential and exempt from public inspection  except with the written
consent of the property owner or as ordered by a court.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, disclosure may be made to potential fund-
ing sources, regulatory  agencies or agents or consultants of a qualified purchaser in connection with
a transaction between the property owner and a qualified purchaser  under this section, subject to
appropriate confidentiality agreements.
[(9) The department shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section. ]
SECTION 6.
 ORS 456.263 is amended to read:
456.263. [ (1)(a) Within the first 180 days following the expiration of the offer to purchase period
described in ORS 456.262 (6), a property owner may accept a third party’s offer to purchase the  par-
ticipating property. This acceptance  shall be made subject to the property owner providing each quali-
fied purchaser the right of first refusal  to purchase the property on the same terms and conditions as
the third party’s offer to purchase, subject to subsection (2) of this section, unless those  terms and
conditions are modified by mutual consent between the qualified purchaser and the property owner. ]
[(b) The property owner shall provide  notice, by registered or certified mail, return receipt re-
quested, to  each qualified purchaser of the terms and conditions of the third party’s offer to
purchase.]
(1) Before selling a participating property that is subject to a recorded notice of right of
first refusal under ORS 456.262 (4) to a third party other than a qualified purchaser, a prop-
erty owner shall send notice of the owner’s intent to  accept a purchase offer by registered
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 5
or certified mail, with return receipt requested, to each party acknowledging under  ORS
456.262 (4)(f) a notice of right  of first refusal under ORS 456.262. The notice delivered under
this subsection must contain a copy of the third party offer or the terms and conditions of
the offer to purchase that the owner intends to accept.
(2) A  qualified purchaser shall have 30 days from the date the notice is mailed to exercise [ its]
a right of first refusal by  [ submitting] delivering a matching offer to purchase the property  by
certified mail. The matching offer must contain a commitment from the qualified purchaser
to preserve the property as affordable on  terms determined by the Housing and Community
Services Department . The property owner shall accept the first matching offer the property  owner
receives from a qualified purchaser under this section.
[(c)] (3) A qualified  purchaser’s offer is a matching offer if it is on the same terms and conditions
as the third party’s offer to purchase , [ but for modifications to ensure compliance with  subsection (2)
of this section, unless those terms and conditions are  modified by mutual consent among the qualified
purchaser and the property owner. ]
[(2) If a qualified purchaser exercises its right of first  refusal, the qualified purchaser and property
owner shall execute a purchase agreement on the same terms and conditions as the  third party’s offer,
except that: ] except that a  qualified purchaser’s offer is considered a matching offer
notwithstanding a conflicting term that includes:
(a) [The] An earnest money deposit [ may not exceed the lesser of ] that is no  less than the least
of the third-party offer,  two percent of the sales price or $250,000[ ;].
(b) That the earnest money deposit [ must be] is  refundable [ for at least ] until the earlier  of 90
days[; and ] or the date of closing.
(c) That closing shall be scheduled at least 240 days after execution of the purchase agreement.
(d) Any nonmaterial term.
(e) Any other term that the property owner has agreed to waive.
(f) A commitment to maintain the affordability  of the property required under subsection
(2) of this section.
[(3)] (4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply [ when] if:
[(a) A local government or the state takes the participating property by  eminent domain or a ne-
gotiated purchase in lieu of eminent domain; ]
[(b) There is a forced sale of the participating property under a foreclosure; ]
[(c) The participating property is subject to a  deed in lieu of foreclosure or a negotiated purchase
to avoid foreclosure; ]
[(d) There are more than 30 years remaining before  the first scheduled termination of an
affordability restriction on the property; ]
(a) More than 24  months have elapsed since the participating property was eligible for
withdrawal from publicly supported housing under ORS 456.262 (5);
[(e)] (b) The property owner  accepted a third party’s offer to purchase the participating property
before [ October 6, 2017 ] the effective date of this 2019 Act , and has provided documentation  of the
purchase agreement to the Housing and Community Services Department;
[(f)] (c)  The third party offeror agrees to [ maintain the] affordability restrictions on the partic-
ipating property, as determined by the department [ by rule ], to ensure that the participating prop-
erty remains publicly supported housing; or
[(g)] (d) Any additional situations as determined by the department by rule.
[(4)] (5) A property owner that sells participating property to a third party shall  certify that the
owner has complied with all provisions of this section and ORS 456.260 and 456.262. A  certification
of compliance under this section shall:
(a) Be recorded in the real property records of the county in which the property is located;
(b) Contain a legal description of the property;
(c) Identify the property owner as the grantor; and
(d) Be acknowledged by the property owner in the  manner required for acknowledgment of a
deed.
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 6
[(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section. ]
SECTION 7. The amendments to ORS 456.260, 456.262 and 456.263 by sections 4 to 6 of this
2019 Act apply to participating properties subject  to an affordability restriction or contract
that will, by its terms, terminate on or after 30  months following the effective date of this
2019 Act.
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 7